Hawaii statutes.
§651-123 Application of proceeds of sale.
When the property thus taken is sold, which sale shall be subject to all prior
liens and encumbrances, the proceeds of the sale thereof shall be applied in
the following order of priority: first, to the defendant to the amount of the
exemption, if any; second, to the satisfaction of the execution costs,
attorney's and appraiser's fees, and any other fees that may necessarily arise;
third, to the satisfaction of the lien under which the sale is made; fourth, to
the discharge of any subsequent liens and encumbrances according to their
priority; and fifth, the balance, if any, to the defendant. The sale shall
operate to extinguish subsequent liens and encumbrances without forcing prior
lienors and encumbrancers to their right of recovery. [L 1976, c 136, pt of §2;
am L 1978, c 46, §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next